en: Hardness: Hard; Medium; Soft; Other
fr: Rigidité: Difficile; Moyen; Doux; Autre
vi: Độ cứng: Cứng; Vừa; Mềm; Khác
th: ความแข็ง: แข็ง; สื่อ; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 硬度: 硬; 媒介; 柔軟; 其他
pl: Twardość: Twardy; Środek; Miękki; Inne
hu: Keménység: Kemény; Közepesen kemény; Puha; Egyéb
fi: Kovuus: Kova; Keskimääräinen; Pehmeä; Muu
de: Härtestufe: Hart; Medium; Weich; Sonstiges
nb: Hardhet: Hard; Middels; Myk; Annet
nl: Hardheid: Hard; Medium; Zacht; Andere
zh-CN: 硬度: 硬; 媒介; 软; 其他
cs: Tvrdost: Tvrdá; Médium; Měkká; Jiné
ru: Твердость: Жесткий; Средний; Мягкий; Другое
tr: Sertlik: Sert; Orta; Yumuşak; Diğer
es: Dureza: Duro; Medio; Blando; Otros
pt-BR: Dureza: Duro; Médio; Macio; Outro
hr-HR: Tvrdoća: Tvrdo; Srednja; Meka; Ostalo
sv: Hårdhet: Hård; Medium; Mjuk; Övrigt
sk-SK: Tvrdosť: Ťažký; Stredný; Mäkký; Iné
ro-RO: Duritate: Dur; Mediu; Moale; Altele
bg-BG: Твърдост: Твърд; Среден; Мек; Други
da: Hårdhed: Hård; Medium; Blød; Andet
ko: 경도: 하드; 매체; 부드러움; 기타
it: Durezza: Dura; Media; Morbida; Altro
sl-SI: Trdota: Trda; Srednja; Mehko; Drugo
ja: 硬さ: ハード; 媒体; ソフト; その他
lt-LT: Tvirtumas: Kietas; Vidutinis; Minkštas; Kita
pt-PT: Dureza: Duro; Médio; Suave; Outro
el: Σκληρότητα: Σκληρή; Μέση; Μαλακό; Άλλο